Indiana, session 2026, HB1062.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-8-2-222 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 222. "Public freshwater
lake", for purposes of IC 14-15-3 and IC 14-26-2, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-26-2-3.
SECTION 2. IC 14-8-2-301.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 301.1. "Wake boarding" means
to:
(1) use a short board with or without foot bindings on which
a rider is towed by a motorboat across a wake; or
(2) operate a motorboat that creates a wake and that tows or
is intended to tow a person who uses a short board with or
without foot bindings on which the person is towed by the
motorboat across the motorboat's wake.
SECTION 3. IC 14-8-2-301.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 301.4. "Wake surfing" means to:
(1) surf a wake, regardless of whether the person is being
pulled by a tow rope attached to the motorboat that is
producing the wake; or
(2) operate a motorboat that creates a wake that is or is
HEA 1062

2
intended to be surfed by another person.
SECTION 4. IC 14-15-3-8.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8.1. An individual shall not operate a motorboat on
a public freshwater lake for the purpose of wake boarding or wake
surfing during the period between sunset and sunrise.
SECTION 5. IC 14-15-3-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) Subject to
section 11 of this chapter, a person may not operate a motorboat upon
a small lake at a speed greater than ten (10) miles per hour.
(b) An individual may not operate a motorboat upon a small
lake while engaging in wake boarding or wake surfing unless it is
during the time and day of a speed exemption granted for the small
lake under section 11 of this chapter.
SECTION 6. IC 14-15-3-11.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.1. A rule adopted under
section 11 of this chapter before July 1, 2026, applies to wake
boarding and wake surfing.
SECTION 7. IC 14-15-3-31, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 31. (a) A person who violates section 2, 3, 5, 7, 8,
8.1, 9, 10, 14, 15, 16, 17, 20, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, or 30 of this
chapter commits a Class C infraction.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates section 6 of
this chapter commits a Class C misdemeanor.
HEA 1062

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1062